Utah statutes.
16-6a-1009.   Effect of amendment of articles of incorporation.
(1)  An amendment to the articles of incorporation does not affect:
(a)  any existing right of persons other than members;
(b)  any cause of action existing against or in favor of the nonprofit
corporation; or
(c)  any proceeding to which the nonprofit corporation is a party.
(2)  An amendment changing a nonprofit corporation's corporate name does not
abate a proceeding brought by or against a nonprofit corporation in its former
corporate name.
